Mississippi statutes. Title 35. War Veterans and Pensions
Mississippi Veterans Memorial Cemetery

§ 35-1-41.
Establishment, operation and maintenance of the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Cemetery; authorization to establish additional veterans cemeteries; eligibility for burial; administration; applications for burial; receipt of federal aid; Mississippi Veterans Cemetery Fund.

The State Veterans Affairs Board is authorized to establish, operate and maintain a Mississippi veterans cemetery in this state, which shall be known as the “Mississippi Veterans Memorial Cemetery.”

The State Veterans Affairs Board is authorized to establish, operate and maintain additional veterans cemeteries in this state.

The State Veterans Affairs Board has the primary responsibility for verifying eligibility for interment in the veterans cemeteries. Eligibility criteria for interment in the cemeteries is the same as required for interment in a national cemetery as provided by federal law and rules and regulations applicable thereto.

The cemeteries shall be under the control and administration of the State Veterans Affairs Board.

Applications for interment in the cemeteries shall be processed in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the State Veterans Affairs Board.

The State Veterans Affairs Board is designated as the agency of this state to receive federal aid under Title 38 USCS, as amended, and is authorized to receive funds from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or any other agency of the United States authorized to grant or expend funds to assist a state in establishing, operating and maintaining veterans cemeteries. The board is authorized to receive gifts, contributions, bequests and individual reimbursements from any source, the receipt of which shall not exclude any other source of revenue. All funds received by the board pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited into a special fund, hereby created and known as the “Mississippi Veterans Cemetery Fund,” and shall be expended to establish, operate and maintain veterans cemeteries in this state. The State Veterans Affairs Board is authorized to employ such personnel as it may deem necessary to carry out its duties and responsibilities under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 10; Laws, 2008, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 401, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 35-1-43.
Establishment, operation and maintenance of Mississippi Persian Gulf War Memorial; purpose of memorial; Mississippi Persian Gulf War Memorial Fund.

The State Veterans Affairs Board may establish, operate and maintain a Mississippi Persian Gulf War Memorial on the grounds of the Mississippi Veterans Memorial Cemetery in Newton County, Mississippi. The purpose of the memorial is to honor and commemorate the sacrifices and service of United States Armed Forces personnel from Mississippi who have served or will serve in the Persian Gulf War between August 2, 1990, and the date on which the conflict is declared to be over, as established by law or presidential proclamation.

The State Veterans Affairs Board is designated the agency of this state to receive any aid or funds from any source for the purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining the Persian Gulf War Memorial. The board may receive gifts, contributions, bequests and individual reimbursements from any source, the receipt of which shall not exclude any other source of revenue.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Mississippi Persian Gulf War Memorial Fund.” All funds received by the board under subsection (2) must be deposited into the special fund and expended by the board to establish, operate and maintain the Mississippi Persian Gulf War Memorial.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 15, 2010).